District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1002

Purposes.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 3, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 8-1004.
1981 Ed., § 6-3402.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.